California, session 20252026, AB1597.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) The recent inflationary cycle has significantly increased the cost of living and doing business in California.(b) Notaries public incur various expenses in the course of performing their duties, including costs for supplies, transportation, insurance, and continuing education.(c) To ensure that notaries public can continue to provide essential services to the public, it is necessary to adjust the maximum fees they may charge for certain services.SEC. 2. Section 8211 of the Government Code is amended to read:8211. Fees charged by a notary public for the following services shall not exceed the fees prescribed by this section.(a) For taking an acknowledgment or proof of a deed, or other instrument, to include the seal and the writing of the certificate, the sum of twenty dollars ($20) for each signature taken.(b) For administering an oath or affirmation to one person and executing the jurat, including the seal, the sum of twenty dollars ($20).(c) For all services rendered in connection with the taking of any deposition, the sum of thirty-five dollars ($35), and in addition thereto, the sum of twelve dollars ($12) for administering the oath to the witness and the sum of twelve dollars ($12) for the certificate to the deposition.(d) No fee may be charged to notarize signatures on vote by mail ballot identification envelopes or other voting materials.(e) For certifying a copy of a power of attorney under Section 4307 of the Probate Code, the sum of twenty dollars ($20).(f) In accordance with Section 6107, no fee may be charged to a United States military veteran for notarization of an application or a claim for a pension, allotment, allowance, compensation, insurance, or any other veteran’s benefit.